Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB962.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 19, 1988 (P.L.1262, No.156), known as the Local Option Small Games of Chance Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 302.1. Games of chance operations.(a) Raffles and drawings.--Virtual sales of games of chance shall be conducted as follows:(1) An eligible organization may accept electronic payment via credit card, debit card, mobile payment service or other electronic payment method in accordance with subsection (b).123456789101112131415161718192021 (2) An eligible organization may only use an Internet-based conferencing software application in the conduct of the game of chance limited to the reveal of the winner of the game of chance.(3) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use or display animation in identifying the winner.(4) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use or display moving or still images in identifying the winner.(5) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use, make or display a graphic presentation in identifying the winner.(6) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use or be completed with the aid of a slot machine, hybrid slot machine or skill slot machine as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 1103 (relating to definitions).(7) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use or be completed with the aid of a video gaming terminal as defined in 4 Pa.C.S. § 3102 (relating to definitions).(8) The reveal of the winner of the game of chance shall not use or be completed with the aid of an electronic video monitor or a simulated gambling program as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 5513(f) (relating to g ambling devices, gambling, etc.).(b) Verification requirements.-- In order to use a mobile payment service under subsection (a)(1) for the conduct or operation of the game of chance, an eligible organization shall take all of the following actions:(1) Employ a mechanism to detect the physical location 20250HB0962PN1039 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a participant who buys a ticket for the game of chance and block an individual located outside of t his Commonwealth from participating in the game of chance. The eligible organization may not accept payment from an individual located outside of this Commonwealth.(2) Employ a mechanism to verify a participant's identity and record the document number of the participant's government-issued credential or employ any other methodology for remote, multisourced identity authentication, including the use of a third-party or government database.(3) Employ a mechanism to verify that a participant is at least 18 years of age and block an individual under 18 years of age from participating in the game of chance. The eligible organization may not accept payment from an individual under 18 years of age.(4) Require a participant to affirm that the information provided by the participant under this subsection is accurate.(5) Record a participant's acknowledgment that the information provided by the participant under this subsection is accurate.(6) Verify that the actions do not violate 31 U.S.C. Ch. 53 Subch. IV (relating to prohibition on funding of unlawful Internet gambling).(c) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Internet-based conferencing software application." Any of the following:(1) A software application that allows for the 20250HB0962PN1039 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transmission of audio and visual communications between users over the Internet, including Zoom, Microsoft Teams, Skype or an equivalent application.(2) A social networking application that allows for the transmission of audio and visual communications between users over the Internet, including Facebook Live or Periscope."Mobile payment service." A service in which a money payment is made electronically through a money transfer service, including Venmo, PayPal, Cash App or an equivalent money transfer service.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0962PN1039 - 4 - 1234567891011